District of Columbia statutes.
32-511

Notice.

(a)

The Mayor shall devise, and an employer shall post and maintain in a conspicuous place, a notice that sets forth excerpts from or summaries of the pertinent provisions of this chapter and information that pertains to the filing of a complaint under this chapter.

(b)

Any employer who willfully violates this section shall be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $100 for each day that employer fails to post the notice.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 12, 37 DCR 5043
1981 Ed., § 36-1311.